Tennessee, session 114, HB0208.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF TENNESSEE:
HB0208
000498
- 1 -

SECTION 1. The National Guard Armory in Cheatham County is named the "First
Sergeant Charles Anderson Douglas National Guard Armory" in recognition of First Sergeant
Charles Anderson Douglas's estimable service to the citizens of this state.
SECTION 2. From existing resources, the department of military is directed to erect
suitable signs or to affix suitable markers designating such edifice as the "First Sergeant
Charles Anderson Douglas National Guard Armory."
SECTION 3. This act takes effect upon becoming a law, the public welfare requiring it.
- 2 - 000498